Nevada, session 83, AB586.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Aging and Disability Services Division of the
Department of Health and Human Services the sum of $3,930,266
for an unanticipated shortfall related to costs associated with
provider payments for developmental services in the Rural Regional
Center budget account. This appropriation is supplemental to that
made by section 17 of chapter 209, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page
1239.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Aging and Disability Services Division of the
Department of Health and Human Services the sum of $189,623 for
an unanticipated shortfall related to costs associated with provider
payments for personal care services in the Home- and Community-
Based Services budget account. This appropriation is supplemental
to that made by section 17 of chapter 209, Statutes of Nevada 2023,
at page 1239.
Sec. 3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Aging and Disability Services Division of the
Department of Health and Human Services the sum of $4,257,914
for an unanticipated shortfall related to costs associated with
provider payments for developmental services in the Desert
Regional Center budget account. This appropriation is supplemental
to that made by section 17 of chapter 209, Statutes of Nevada 2023,
at page 1239.
Sec. 4. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Aging and Disability Services Division of the
Department of Health and Human Services the sum of $7,774,184
for an unanticipated shortfall related to costs associated with
provider payments for developmental services in the Sierra Regional
Center budget account. This appropriation is supplemental to that
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
made by section 17 of chapter 209, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page
1239.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)